Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2692YH (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 417 Section 1. Section 422.12, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. A tuition credit equal to twenty-five fifty percent 3 of the first two thousand dollars which the taxpayer has 4 paid to others for each dependent in grades kindergarten 5 through twelve, for tuition and textbooks of each dependent 6 who is receiving private instruction or who is attending an 7 elementary or secondary school situated in Iowa, which school 8 is accredited or approved under section 256.11 , which is not 9 operated for profit, and which adheres to the provisions 10 of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964 and chapter 216 . 11 Notwithstanding any other provision, all other credits allowed 12 under this subsection shall be deducted before the tuition 13 credit under this paragraph. The department, when conducting 14 an audit of a taxpayerâs return, shall also audit the tuition 15 tax credit portion of the tax return. 16 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 17 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 18 or after that date. 19